Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 14
CHEMIGATION

Sec.

§ 22-1401 — 22-1411. Definitions — Use of irrigation system — Compliance with regulations — Determination of compliance by director — List of types of systems — Duties of supplier of pesticide, fertilizer or herbicide — License — Chemigation without license — Stop work order — Use of fees collected — Penalties. [Repealed.]